Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 2. Animal Welfare

§ 3902.
Registration of fairs.

No person may operate a fair as defined under section 3901 of this title unless a certificate of registration for the fair has been granted by the Secretary. Application for the certificate shall be made in a manner provided by the Secretary. No fee shall be required for the certificate. Certificates of registration shall be valid for a period of one year or until revoked and may be removed for like periods upon application in the manner provided.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 27

, § 5, eff. March 24, 1971; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2013, No. 30

, § 6.

§ 3903.
Animal shelters and rescue organizations.

[Repealed.]

Animal intake. An animal shelter or rescue organization as defined by section 3901 of this title shall make every effort to collect the following information about an animal it accepts: the name and address of the person transferring the animal and, if known, the name of the animal; its vaccination history; and other information concerning the background, temperament, and health of the animal.

Nonprofit status. A rescue organization under this chapter shall be recognized and approved as a nonprofit organization under

26 U.S.C. § 501(c)

(3).

Immunity from liability. Notwithstanding section 3901a of this title, any animal shelter or rescue organization assisting law enforcement in an animal cruelty investigation or seizure that, in good faith, provides care and treatment to an animal involved in the investigation or seizure shall not be held liable for civil damages by the owner of the animal unless the actions of the shelter or organization constitute gross negligence.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 27

, § 5, eff. March 24, 1971; amended

1997, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2009, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2013, No. 30

, § 6;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2018, No. 8

(Sp. Sess.), § 15, eff. June 28, 2018.

§ 3904.
Repealed. 1993, No. 51, § 5.

§ 3905.
Public auctions.

No person may operate a public auction as defined in this chapter after September 24, 1971 unless a license to operate the auction has been granted by the Secretary. The license period shall be April 1 to March 31, and the license fee shall be $10.00 for each license period or part thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 27

, § 5, eff. March 24, 1971; amended

1975, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2013, No. 30

, § 6.

§ 3906.
Licensing of pet shops.

No person may transact business as a pet shop, as defined in this chapter, unless a license for that purpose has been granted by the Secretary to that person. Application for the license shall be made in the manner provided by the Secretary. The license period shall be April 1 to March 31 and the license fee shall be $175.00 for each license period or part thereof.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 27

, § 5, eff. March 24, 1971; amended

1975, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

1989, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

1993, No. 51

, § 2;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 44;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2003, No. 66

, §§ 102a, 102d;

2013, No. 30

, § 6;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 29.

§ 3907.
Denial or revocation of registration or license.

Issuance of a certificate of registration may be denied to any animal shelter, rescue organization, or fair or a license may be denied to any public auction or pet shop or any certificate or license previously granted under this chapter may be revoked by the Secretary if, after public hearing, it is determined that the housing facilities or primary enclosures are inadequate for the purposes of this chapter or if the feeding, watering, sanitizing, and housing practices of the animal shelter, rescue organization, fair, public auction, or pet shop, as the case may be, are not consistent with this chapter or with rules adopted under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 27

, § 5, eff. March 24, 1971; amended

1993, No. 51

, § 3;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2009, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2013, No. 30

, § 6.

§ 3908.
Adoption of rules.

The Secretary may as he or she deems necessary adopt, amend, revise, and repeal rules consistent with this chapter for the purpose of carrying out its purposes. The rules may include provisions relating to humane transportation to and from registered or licensed premises, records of purchase and sale, identification of animals, primary enclosures, housing facilities, sanitation, euthanasia, ambient temperatures, feeding, watering, and adequate veterinary medical care, with respect to animals kept or cared for at premises licensed or registered under this chapter. The Secretary may at his or her discretion adopt in whole or in part those portions of the rules of the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets under Public Law 89-544, commonly known as the Animal Welfare Act, that are consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 27

, § 5, eff. March 24, 1971; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2009, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2013, No. 30

, § 6;

2017, No. 74

, § 29.

§ 3909.
Sale of animals by humane society.

The board of directors of an incorporated humane society shall determine the method of disposition of animals released by it. Any proceeds derived from the sale of animals by the society shall be paid to the clerk or treasurer of the humane society, and no part of the proceeds shall accrue to any individual. Proceeds from the sale of animals by any person authorized by a municipality to dispose of such animals shall revert to the treasury of the municipality.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 27

, § 5, eff. March 24, 1971; amended

2013, No. 30

, § 6.

§ 3910.
Exceptions.

This chapter shall not apply to any place or establishment operated as an animal hospital under the supervision of a duly licensed veterinarian in connection with the treatment, alleviation, or prevention of diseases.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 27

, § 5, eff. March 24, 1971; amended

2013, No. 30

, § 6.

§ 3911.
Penalties.

Any person licensed or registered under this chapter who fails to provide animals under the person’s care or custody with adequate food or adequate water, as defined in section 3901 of this title, or who fails to house animals in the person’s care or custody in a manner that is adequate for their welfare, shall be fined not more than $500.00.

Any person who operates a fair or public auction or who transacts business as a pet shop, animal shelter, or rescue organization without being duly licensed or without possessing a proper certificate of registration, as the case may be, as required under this chapter, or who violates any provision of this chapter or of any rule lawfully adopted under its authority for which no other penalty is provided shall be fined not more than $300.00 or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.

The Secretary may assess administrative penalties under

6 V.S.A. §§ 15-17

, not to exceed $1,000.00, for violations of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 27

, § 5, eff. March 24, 1971; amended

1993, No. 51

, § 4;

1997, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2009, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2013, No. 30

, § 6.

§ 3912.
Commitment of animals to Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

The Secretary or any officer of the Agency designated by the Secretary may file with the court in which a person was convicted of violating section 3911 of this chapter a petition for custody of animals in the possession of the person convicted. If the court, on due notice to that person and to any other person owning or having any interest in the animals, finds that the welfare of any of the animals so requires, the court shall order the animals committed to the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets. Animals committed to the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets may be sold or euthanized or kept in the custody of the Agency, as the Secretary determines.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 27

, § 5, eff. March 24, 1971; amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2013, No. 30

, § 6.

§ 3913.
Euthanasia certification.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall establish rules for a euthanasia training program and certification process for persons completing the program.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall establish rules for the possession and use of euthanasia solutions by registered animal shelters that utilize certified euthanasia technicians. The rules shall identify euthanasia solutions that may be used, techniques for the proper handling and storage of solutions and requirements for recordkeeping, and address any other matter deemed necessary by the Secretary.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets may revoke or suspend certification upon violation of the rules adopted under this section.

The rules shall comply with all applicable federal drug enforcement standards.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets has no responsibility to enforce any other statute relating to the abuse of narcotics or other regulated substance unless specifically authorized by such statute.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1994; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2013, No. 30

, § 6.

§ 3914.
Special funds.

Fees collected under this subchapter shall be credited to a special fund and shall be available to the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets to offset the cost of providing the services.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 49

, § 131; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2013, No. 30

, § 6.

§ 3915.
Health certificate for transport into State.

A dog, cat, ferret, or wolf-hybrid imported into the State for sale, resale, exchange, or donation shall be accompanied by an official health certificate or similar certificate of inspection for the dog, cat, ferret, or wolf-hybrid issued by a veterinarian licensed in the state or country of origin. The certificate shall certify that:

the dog, cat, ferret, or wolf-hybrid has been inspected and is free of visible signs of infections or contagious or communicable disease; and

if the dog, cat, ferret, or wolf-hybrid is more than three months of age, the dog, cat, ferret, or wolf-hybrid has a current rabies vaccination or is a specific breed for which a rabies vaccination is not age-appropriate.

The Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets may adopt rules regarding the issuance and contents of any certificate required under subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 15; amended

2013, No. 30

, § 6.